Illinois, session 104th, HB2748.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended 5by changing Sections 1-10, 10-10, 10-15, 10-20, 15-80, and 615-85 as follows: 7    (410 ILCS 705/1-10)8    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. In this Act:9    "Adult Use Cultivation Center License" means a license 10issued by the Department of Agriculture that permits a person 11to act as a cultivation center under this Act and any 12administrative rule made in furtherance of this Act.13    "Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" means a 14license issued by the Department of Financial and Professional 15Regulation that permits a person to act as a dispensing 16organization under this Act and any administrative rule made 17in furtherance of this Act.18    "Advertise" means to engage in promotional activities 19including, but not limited to: newspaper, radio, Internet and 20electronic media, and television advertising; the distribution 21of fliers and circulars; billboard advertising; and the 22display of window and interior signs. "Advertise" does not 23mean exterior signage displaying only the name of the licensed   HB2748- 2 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1cannabis business establishment. 2    "Application points" means the number of points a 3Dispensary Applicant receives on an application for a 4Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License. 5    "BLS Region" means a region in Illinois used by the United 6States Bureau of Labor Statistics to gather and categorize 7certain employment and wage data. The 17 such regions in 8Illinois are: Bloomington, Cape Girardeau, Carbondale-Marion, 9Champaign-Urbana, Chicago-Naperville-Elgin, Danville, 10Davenport-Moline-Rock Island, Decatur, Kankakee, Peoria, 11Rockford, St. Louis, Springfield, Northwest Illinois 12nonmetropolitan area, West Central Illinois nonmetropolitan 13area, East Central Illinois nonmetropolitan area, and South 14Illinois nonmetropolitan area. 15    "By lot" means a randomized method of choosing between 2 16or more Eligible Tied Applicants or 2 or more Qualifying 17Applicants.18    "Cannabis" means marijuana, hashish, and other substances 19that are identified as including any parts of the plant 20Cannabis sativa and including derivatives or subspecies, such 21as indica, of all strains of cannabis, whether growing or not; 22the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of the 23plant; and any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, 24mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or resin, 25including tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) and all other naturally 26produced cannabinol derivatives, whether produced directly or   HB2748- 3 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1indirectly by extraction; however, "cannabis" does not include 2the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the 3stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other 4compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or 5preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted 6from it), fiber, oil or cake, or the sterilized seed of the 7plant that is incapable of germination. "Cannabis" does not 8include industrial hemp as defined and authorized under the 9Industrial Hemp Act. "Cannabis" also means cannabis flower, 10concentrate, and cannabis-infused products.11    "Cannabis business establishment" means a cultivation 12center, craft grower, processing organization, infuser 13organization, dispensing organization, or transporting 14organization.15    "Cannabis concentrate" means a product derived from 16cannabis that is produced by extracting cannabinoids, 17including tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), from the plant through 18the use of propylene glycol, glycerin, butter, olive oil, or 19other typical cooking fats; water, ice, or dry ice; or butane, 20propane, CO2, ethanol, or isopropanol and with the intended 21use of smoking or making a cannabis-infused product. The use 22of any other solvent is expressly prohibited unless and until 23it is approved by the Department of Agriculture.24    "Cannabis container" means a sealed or resealable, 25traceable, container, or package used for the purpose of 26containment of cannabis or cannabis-infused product during   HB2748- 4 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1transportation.2    "Cannabis flower" means marijuana, hashish, and other 3substances that are identified as including any parts of the 4plant Cannabis sativa and including derivatives or subspecies, 5such as indica, of all strains of cannabis; including raw 6kief, leaves, and buds, but not resin that has been extracted 7from any part of such plant; nor any compound, manufacture, 8salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its 9seeds, or resin.10    "Cannabis-infused product" means a beverage, food, oil, 11ointment, tincture, topical formulation, or another product 12containing cannabis or cannabis concentrate that is not 13intended to be smoked.14    "Cannabis paraphernalia" means equipment, products, or 15materials intended to be used for planting, propagating, 16cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, producing, 17processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, 18repackaging, storing, containing, concealing, ingesting, or 19otherwise introducing cannabis into the human body. 20    "Cannabis plant monitoring system" or "plant monitoring 21system" means a system that includes, but is not limited to, 22testing and data collection established and maintained by the 23cultivation center, craft grower, or processing organization 24and that is available to the Department of Revenue, the 25Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 26Professional Regulation, and the Illinois State Police for the   HB2748- 5 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1purposes of documenting each cannabis plant and monitoring 2plant development throughout the life cycle of a cannabis 3plant cultivated for the intended use by a customer from seed 4planting to final packaging.5    "Cannabis testing facility" means an entity registered by 6the Department of Agriculture to test cannabis for potency and 7contaminants.8    "Clone" means a plant section from a female cannabis plant 9not yet rootbound, growing in a water solution or other 10propagation matrix, that is capable of developing into a new 11plant.12    "Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 13Program faculty participant" means a person who is 21 years of 14age or older, licensed by the Department of Agriculture, and 15is employed or contracted by an Illinois community college to 16provide student instruction using cannabis plants at an 17Illinois Community College.18    "Community College Cannabis Vocational Training Pilot 19Program faculty participant Agent Identification Card" means a 20document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 21identifies a person as a Community College Cannabis Vocational 22Training Pilot Program faculty participant.23    "Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" 24means a contingent license awarded to applicants for an Adult 25Use Dispensing Organization License that reserves the right to 26an Adult Use Dispensing Organization License if the applicant   HB2748- 6 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1meets certain conditions described in this Act, but does not 2entitle the recipient to begin purchasing or selling cannabis 3or cannabis-infused products.4    "Conditional Adult Use Cultivation Center License" means a 5license awarded to top-scoring applicants for an Adult Use 6Cultivation Center License that reserves the right to an Adult 7Use Cultivation Center License if the applicant meets certain 8conditions as determined by the Department of Agriculture by 9rule, but does not entitle the recipient to begin growing, 10processing, or selling cannabis or cannabis-infused products.11    "Craft grower" means a facility operated by an 12organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 13Agriculture to cultivate, dry, cure, and package cannabis and 14perform other necessary activities to make cannabis available 15for sale at a dispensing organization or use at a processing 16organization. A craft grower may contain up to 5,000 square 17feet of canopy space on its premises for plants in the 18flowering state. The Department of Agriculture may authorize 19an increase or decrease of flowering stage cultivation space 20in increments of 3,000 square feet by rule based on market 21need, craft grower capacity, and the licensee's history of 22compliance or noncompliance, with a maximum space of 14,000 23square feet for cultivating plants in the flowering stage, 24which must be cultivated in all stages of growth in an enclosed 25and secure area. A craft grower may share premises with a 26processing organization or a dispensing organization, or both,   HB2748- 7 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1provided each licensee stores currency and cannabis or 2cannabis-infused products in a separate secured vault to which 3the other licensee does not have access or all licensees 4sharing a vault share more than 50% of the same ownership. 5    "Craft grower agent" means a principal officer, board 6member, employee, or other agent of a craft grower who is 21 7years of age or older.8    "Craft Grower Agent Identification Card" means a document 9issued by the Department of Agriculture that identifies a 10person as a craft grower agent.11    "Cultivation center" means a facility operated by an 12organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 13Agriculture to cultivate, process, transport (unless otherwise 14limited by this Act), and perform other necessary activities 15to provide cannabis and cannabis-infused products to cannabis 16business establishments.17    "Cultivation center agent" means a principal officer, 18board member, employee, or other agent of a cultivation center 19who is 21 years of age or older.20    "Cultivation Center Agent Identification Card" means a 21document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 22identifies a person as a cultivation center agent.23    "Currency" means currency and coin of the United States.24    "Dispensary" means a facility operated by a dispensing 25organization at which activities licensed by this Act may 26occur.  HB2748- 8 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1    "Dispensary Applicant" means the Proposed Dispensing 2Organization Name as stated on an application for a 3Conditional Adult Use Dispensing Organization License. 4    "Dispensing organization" means a facility operated by an 5organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 6Financial and Professional Regulation to acquire cannabis from 7a cultivation center, craft grower, processing organization, 8or another dispensary for the purpose of selling or dispensing 9cannabis, cannabis-infused products, cannabis seeds, 10paraphernalia, or related supplies under this Act to 11purchasers or to qualified registered medical cannabis 12patients and caregivers. As used in this Act, "dispensing 13organization" includes a registered medical cannabis 14organization as defined in the Compassionate Use of Medical 15Cannabis Program Act or its successor Act that has obtained an 16Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License.17    "Dispensing organization agent" means a principal officer, 18employee, or agent of a dispensing organization who is 21 19years of age or older.20    "Dispensing organization agent identification card" means 21a document issued by the Department of Financial and 22Professional Regulation that identifies a person as a 23dispensing organization agent.24    "Disproportionately Impacted Area" means a census tract or 25comparable geographic area that satisfies the following 26criteria as determined by the Department of Commerce and   HB2748- 9 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1Economic Opportunity, that: 2        (1) meets at least one of the following criteria: 3            (A) the area has a poverty rate of at least 20% 4        according to the latest federal decennial census; or 5            (B) 75% or more of the children in the area 6        participate in the federal free lunch program 7        according to reported statistics from the State Board 8        of Education; or 9            (C) at least 20% of the households in the area 10        receive assistance under the Supplemental Nutrition 11        Assistance Program; or12            (D) the area has an average unemployment rate, as 13        determined by the Illinois Department of Employment 14        Security, that is more than 120% of the national 15        unemployment average, as determined by the United 16        States Department of Labor, for a period of at least 2 17        consecutive calendar years preceding the date of the 18        application; and 19        (2) has high rates of arrest, conviction, and 20    incarceration related to the sale, possession, use, 21    cultivation, manufacture, or transport of cannabis.22    "Early Approval Adult Use Cultivation Center License" 23means a license that permits a medical cannabis cultivation 24center licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical 25Cannabis Program Act as of the effective date of this Act to 26begin cultivating, infusing, packaging, transporting (unless   HB2748- 10 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1otherwise provided in this Act), processing, and selling 2cannabis or cannabis-infused product to cannabis business 3establishments for resale to purchasers as permitted by this 4Act as of January 1, 2020.5    "Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization License" 6means a license that permits a medical cannabis dispensing 7organization licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical 8Cannabis Program Act as of the effective date of this Act to 9begin selling cannabis or cannabis-infused product to 10purchasers as permitted by this Act as of January 1, 2020.11    "Early Approval Adult Use Dispensing Organization at a 12secondary site" means a license that permits a medical 13cannabis dispensing organization licensed under the 14Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act as of the 15effective date of this Act to begin selling cannabis or 16cannabis-infused product to purchasers as permitted by this 17Act on January 1, 2020 at a different dispensary location from 18its existing registered medical dispensary location.19    "Eligible Tied Applicant" means a Tied Applicant that is 20eligible to participate in the process by which a remaining 21available license is distributed by lot pursuant to a Tied 22Applicant Lottery. 23    "Enclosed, locked facility" means a room, greenhouse, 24building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other 25security devices that permit access only by cannabis business 26establishment agents working for the licensed cannabis   HB2748- 11 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1business establishment or acting pursuant to this Act to 2cultivate, process, store, or distribute cannabis.3    "Enclosed, locked space" means a closet, room, greenhouse, 4building, or other enclosed area equipped with locks or other 5security devices that permit access only by authorized 6individuals under this Act. "Enclosed, locked space" may 7include:8        (1) a space within a residential building that (i) is 9    the primary residence of the individual cultivating 5 or 10    fewer cannabis plants that are more than 5 inches tall and 11    (ii) includes sleeping quarters and indoor plumbing. The 12    space must only be accessible by a key or code that is 13    different from any key or code that can be used to access 14    the residential building from the exterior; or15        (2) a structure, such as a shed or greenhouse, that 16    lies on the same plot of land as a residential building 17    that (i) includes sleeping quarters and indoor plumbing 18    and (ii) is used as a primary residence by the person 19    cultivating 5 or fewer cannabis plants that are more than 20    5 inches tall, such as a shed or greenhouse. The structure 21    must remain locked when it is unoccupied by people. 22    "Financial institution" has the same meaning as "financial 23organization" as defined in Section 1501 of the Illinois 24Income Tax Act, and also includes the holding companies, 25subsidiaries, and affiliates of such financial organizations. 26    "Flowering stage" means the stage of cultivation where and   HB2748- 12 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1when a cannabis plant is cultivated to produce plant material 2for cannabis products. This includes mature plants as follows:3        (1) if greater than 2 stigmas are visible at each 4    internode of the plant; or5        (2) if the cannabis plant is in an area that has been 6    intentionally deprived of light for a period of time 7    intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, 8    from the moment the light deprivation began through the 9    remainder of the marijuana plant growth cycle.10    "Hemp" has the same meaning given to that term in the 11Industrial Hemp Act. 12    "Individual" means a natural person.13    "Infuser organization" or "infuser" means a facility 14operated by an organization or business that is licensed by 15the Department of Agriculture to directly incorporate cannabis 16or cannabis concentrate into a product formulation to produce 17a cannabis-infused product. 18    "Kief" means the resinous crystal-like trichomes that are 19found on cannabis and that are accumulated, resulting in a 20higher concentration of cannabinoids, untreated by heat or 21pressure, or extracted using a solvent. 22    "Labor peace agreement" means an agreement between a 23cannabis business establishment and any labor organization 24recognized under the National Labor Relations Act, referred to 25in this Act as a bona fide labor organization, that prohibits 26labor organizations and members from engaging in picketing,   HB2748- 13 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1work stoppages, boycotts, and any other economic interference 2with the cannabis business establishment. This agreement means 3that the cannabis business establishment has agreed not to 4disrupt efforts by the bona fide labor organization to 5communicate with, and attempt to organize and represent, the 6cannabis business establishment's employees. The agreement 7shall provide a bona fide labor organization access at 8reasonable times to areas in which the cannabis business 9establishment's employees work, for the purpose of meeting 10with employees to discuss their right to representation, 11employment rights under State law, and terms and conditions of 12employment. This type of agreement shall not mandate a 13particular method of election or certification of the bona 14fide labor organization.15    "Limited access area" means a room or other area under the 16control of a cannabis dispensing organization licensed under 17this Act and upon the licensed premises where cannabis sales 18occur with access limited to purchasers, dispensing 19organization owners and other dispensing organization agents, 20or service professionals conducting business with the 21dispensing organization, or, if sales to registered qualifying 22patients, caregivers, provisional patients, and Opioid 23Alternative Pilot Program participants licensed pursuant to 24the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act are also 25permitted at the dispensary, registered qualifying patients, 26caregivers, provisional patients, and Opioid Alternative Pilot   HB2748- 14 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1Program participants. 2    "Member of an impacted family" means an individual who has 3a parent, legal guardian, child, spouse, or dependent, or was 4a dependent of an individual who, prior to the effective date 5of this Act, was arrested for, convicted of, or adjudicated 6delinquent for any offense that is eligible for expungement 7under this Act.8    "Mother plant" means a cannabis plant that is cultivated 9or maintained for the purpose of generating clones, and that 10will not be used to produce plant material for sale to an 11infuser or dispensing organization.12    "Ordinary public view" means within the sight line with 13normal visual range of a person, unassisted by visual aids, 14from a public street or sidewalk adjacent to real property, or 15from within an adjacent property. 16    "Ownership and control" means ownership of at least 51% of 17the business, including corporate stock if a corporation, and 18control over the management and day-to-day operations of the 19business and an interest in the capital, assets, and profits 20and losses of the business proportionate to percentage of 21ownership.22    "Person" means a natural individual, firm, partnership, 23association, joint stock company, joint venture, public or 24private corporation, limited liability company, or a receiver, 25executor, trustee, guardian, or other representative appointed 26by order of any court.  HB2748- 15 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1    "Possession limit" means the amount of cannabis under 2Section 10-10 that may be possessed at any one time by a person 321 years of age or older or who is a registered qualifying 4medical cannabis patient or caregiver under the Compassionate 5Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act.6    "Principal officer" includes a cannabis business 7establishment applicant or licensed cannabis business 8establishment's board member, owner with more than 1% interest 9of the total cannabis business establishment or more than 5% 10interest of the total cannabis business establishment of a 11publicly traded company, president, vice president, secretary, 12treasurer, partner, officer, member, manager member, or person 13with a profit sharing, financial interest, or revenue sharing 14arrangement. The definition includes a person with authority 15to control the cannabis business establishment, a person who 16assumes responsibility for the debts of the cannabis business 17establishment and who is further defined in this Act.18    "Primary residence" means a dwelling where a person 19usually stays or stays more often than other locations. It may 20be determined by, without limitation, presence, tax filings; 21address on an Illinois driver's license, an Illinois 22Identification Card, or an Illinois Person with a Disability 23Identification Card; or voter registration. No person may have 24more than one primary residence.25    "Processing organization" or "processor" means a facility 26operated by an organization or business that is licensed by   HB2748- 16 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1the Department of Agriculture to either extract constituent 2chemicals or compounds to produce cannabis concentrate or 3incorporate cannabis or cannabis concentrate into a product 4formulation to produce a cannabis product. 5    "Processing organization agent" means a principal officer, 6board member, employee, or agent of a processing organization.7    "Processing organization agent identification card" means 8a document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 9identifies a person as a processing organization agent.10    "Purchaser" means a person 21 years of age or older who 11acquires cannabis for a valuable consideration. "Purchaser" 12does not include a cardholder under the Compassionate Use of 13Medical Cannabis Program Act.14    "Qualifying Applicant" means an applicant that submitted 15an application pursuant to Section 15-30 that received at 16least 85% of 250 application points available under Section 1715-30 as the applicant's final score and meets the definition 18of "Social Equity Applicant" as set forth under this Section.19    "Qualifying Social Equity Justice Involved Applicant" 20means an applicant that submitted an application pursuant to 21Section 15-30 that received at least 85% of 250 application 22points available under Section 15-30 as the applicant's final 23score and meets the criteria of either paragraph (1) or (2) of 24the definition of "Social Equity Applicant" as set forth under 25this Section. 26    "Qualified Social Equity Applicant" means a Social Equity   HB2748- 17 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1Applicant who has been awarded a conditional license under 2this Act to operate a cannabis business establishment.3    "Resided" means an individual's primary residence was 4located within the relevant geographic area as established by 52 of the following:6        (1) a signed lease agreement that includes the 7    applicant's name;8        (2) a property deed that includes the applicant's 9    name;10        (3) school records;11        (4) a voter registration card;12        (5) an Illinois driver's license, an Illinois 13    Identification Card, or an Illinois Person with a 14    Disability Identification Card;15        (6) a paycheck stub; 16        (7) a utility bill; 17        (8) tax records; or18        (9) any other proof of residency or other information 19    necessary to establish residence as provided by rule.20    "Smoking" means the inhalation of smoke caused by the 21combustion of cannabis.22    "Social Equity Applicant" means an applicant that is an 23Illinois resident that meets one of the following criteria:24        (1) an applicant with at least 51% ownership and 25    control by one or more individuals who have resided for at 26    least 5 of the preceding 10 years in a Disproportionately   HB2748- 18 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1    Impacted Area; 2        (2) an applicant with at least 51% ownership and 3    control by one or more individuals who: 4            (i) have been arrested for, convicted of, or 5        adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is 6        eligible for expungement under this Act; or 7            (ii) is a member of an impacted family;8        (3) for applicants with a minimum of 10 full-time 9    employees, an applicant with at least 51% of current 10    employees who:11            (i) currently reside in a Disproportionately 12        Impacted Area; or13            (ii) have been arrested for, convicted of, or 14        adjudicated delinquent for any offense that is 15        eligible for expungement under this Act or member of 16        an impacted family.17    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to preempt or limit 18the duties of any employer under the Job Opportunities for 19Qualified Applicants Act. Nothing in this Act shall permit an 20employer to require an employee to disclose sealed or expunged 21offenses, unless otherwise required by law.22    "Tied Applicant" means an application submitted by a 23Dispensary Applicant pursuant to Section 15-30 that received 24the same number of application points under Section 15-30 as 25the Dispensary Applicant's final score as one or more 26top-scoring applications in the same BLS Region and would have   HB2748- 19 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1been awarded a license but for the one or more other 2top-scoring applications that received the same number of 3application points. Each application for which a Dispensary 4Applicant was required to pay a required application fee for 5the application period ending January 2, 2020 shall be 6considered an application of a separate Tied Applicant.7    "Tied Applicant Lottery" means the process established 8under 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1291.50 for awarding Conditional Adult 9Use Dispensing Organization Licenses pursuant to Sections 1015-25 and 15-30 among Eligible Tied Applicants. 11    "Tincture" means a cannabis-infused solution, typically 12comprised of alcohol, glycerin, or vegetable oils, derived 13either directly from the cannabis plant or from a processed 14cannabis extract. A tincture is not an alcoholic liquor as 15defined in the Liquor Control Act of 1934. A tincture shall 16include a calibrated dropper or other similar device capable 17of accurately measuring servings.18    "Transporting organization" or "transporter" means an 19organization or business that is licensed by the Department of 20Agriculture to transport cannabis or cannabis-infused product 21on behalf of a cannabis business establishment or a community 22college licensed under the Community College Cannabis 23Vocational Training Pilot Program. 24    "Transporting organization agent" means a principal 25officer, board member, employee, or agent of a transporting 26organization.  HB2748- 20 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1    "Transporting organization agent identification card" 2means a document issued by the Department of Agriculture that 3identifies a person as a transporting organization agent.4    "Unit of local government" means any county, city, 5village, or incorporated town.6    "Vegetative stage" means the stage of cultivation in which 7a cannabis plant is propagated to produce additional cannabis 8plants or reach a sufficient size for production. This 9includes seedlings, clones, mothers, and other immature 10cannabis plants as follows: 11        (1) if the cannabis plant is in an area that has not 12    been intentionally deprived of light for a period of time 13    intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, it 14    has no more than 2 stigmas visible at each internode of the 15    cannabis plant; or 16        (2) any cannabis plant that is cultivated solely for 17    the purpose of propagating clones and is never used to 18    produce cannabis.19(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 20102-98, eff. 7-15-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 215-13-22.) 22    (410 ILCS 705/10-10)23    Sec. 10-10. Possession limit. 24    (a) Except if otherwise authorized by this Act, for a 25person who is 21 years of age or older and a resident of this   HB2748- 21 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1State, the possession limit is as follows:2        (1) 30 grams of cannabis flower;3        (2) no more than 500 milligrams of THC contained in 4    cannabis-infused product;5        (3) 5 grams of cannabis concentrate; and6        (4) for registered qualifying patients, any cannabis 7    produced by cannabis plants grown under subsection (b) of 8    Section 10-5, provided any amount of cannabis produced in 9    excess of 30 grams of raw cannabis or its equivalent must 10    remain secured within the residence or residential 11    property in which it was grown.12    (b) For a person who is 21 years of age or older and who is 13not a resident of this State, the possession limit is:14        (1) 15 grams of cannabis flower; 15        (2) 2.5 grams of cannabis concentrate; and16        (3) 250 milligrams of THC contained in a 17    cannabis-infused product. 18    (c) The possession limits found in subsections (a) and (b) 19of this Section are to be considered cumulative. 20    (d) No person shall knowingly obtain, seek to obtain, or 21possess an amount of cannabis from a dispensing organization 22or craft grower that would cause him or her to exceed the 23possession limit under this Section, including cannabis that 24is cultivated by a person under this Act or obtained under the 25Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act.26    (e) Cannabis and cannabis-derived substances regulated   HB2748- 22 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1under the Industrial Hemp Act are not covered by this Act. 2(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.) 3    (410 ILCS 705/10-15)4    Sec. 10-15. Persons under 21 years of age. 5    (a) Nothing in this Act is intended to permit the transfer 6of cannabis, cannabis-infused products, CBD, or hemp, with or 7without remuneration, to a person under 21 years of age, or to 8allow a person under 21 years of age to purchase, possess, use, 9process, transport, grow, or consume cannabis, 10cannabis-infused products, CBD, or hemp, except where 11authorized by the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 12Program Act or by the Community College Cannabis Vocational 13Pilot Program. 14    (b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law 15authorizing the possession of medical cannabis, nothing in 16this Act authorizes a person who is under 21 years of age to 17possess cannabis, cannabis-infused products, CBD, or hemp. A 18person under 21 years of age with cannabis, cannabis-infused 19products, CBD, or hemp in the person's his or her possession is 20guilty of a civil law violation as outlined in paragraph (a) of 21Section 4 of the Cannabis Control Act.22    (c) If the person under the age of 21 was in a motor 23vehicle at the time of the offense, the Secretary of State may 24suspend or revoke the driving privileges of any person for a 25violation of this Section under Section 6-206 of the Illinois   HB2748- 23 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1Vehicle Code and the rules adopted under it.2    (d) It is unlawful for any parent or guardian to knowingly 3permit his or her residence, any other private property under 4his or her control, or any vehicle, conveyance, or watercraft 5under his or her control to be used by an invitee of the 6parent's child or the guardian's ward, if the invitee is under 7the age of 21, in a manner that constitutes a violation of this 8Section. A parent or guardian is deemed to have knowingly 9permitted his or her residence, any other private property 10under his or her control, or any vehicle, conveyance, or 11watercraft under his or her control to be used in violation of 12this Section if he or she knowingly authorizes or permits 13consumption of cannabis by underage invitees. Any person who 14violates this subsection (d) is guilty of a Class A 15misdemeanor and the person's sentence shall include, but shall 16not be limited to, a fine of not less than $500. If a violation 17of this subsection (d) directly or indirectly results in great 18bodily harm or death to any person, the person violating this 19subsection is guilty of a Class 4 felony. In this subsection 20(d), where the residence or other property has an owner and a 21tenant or lessee, the trier of fact may infer that the 22residence or other property is occupied only by the tenant or 23lessee.24(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19.) 25    (410 ILCS 705/10-20)  HB2748- 24 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1    Sec. 10-20. Identification; false identification; penalty. 2    (a) To protect personal privacy, the Department of 3Financial and Professional Regulation shall not require a 4purchaser to provide a dispensing organization with personal 5information other than government-issued identification to 6determine the purchaser's age, and a dispensing organization 7shall not obtain and record personal information about a 8purchaser without the purchaser's consent. A dispensing 9organization shall use an electronic reader or electronic 10scanning device to scan a purchaser's government-issued 11identification, if applicable, to determine the purchaser's 12age and the validity of the identification. Any identifying or 13personal information of a purchaser obtained or received in 14accordance with this Section shall not be retained, used, 15shared or disclosed for any purpose except as authorized by 16this Act.17    (b) A person who is under 21 years of age may not present 18or offer to a cannabis business establishment or the cannabis 19business establishment's principal or employee any written or 20oral evidence of age that is false, fraudulent, or not 21actually the person's own, for the purpose of: 22        (1) purchasing, attempting to purchase, or otherwise 23    obtaining or attempting to obtain cannabis, 24    cannabis-infused products, CBD, or hemp or any cannabis 25    product; or 26        (2) gaining access to a cannabis business   HB2748- 25 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1    establishment.2    (c) A violation of this Section is a Class A misdemeanor 3consistent with Section 6-20 of the Liquor Control Act of 41934.5    (d) The Secretary of State may suspend or revoke the 6driving privileges of any person for a violation of this 7Section under Section 6-206 of the Illinois Vehicle Code and 8the rules adopted under it.9     (e) Any retailer who violates Section 15-85 of this Act is 10guilty of a petty offense. For the first offense in a 24-month 11period, the retailer shall be fined $200 if it does not have a 12training program that facilitates compliance with minimum-age 13cannabis laws. For the second offense in a 24-month period, 14the retailer shall be fined $400 if it does not have a training 15program that facilitates compliance with minimum-age cannabis 16laws. For the third offense within a 24-month period, the 17retailer shall be fined $600 if it does not have a training 18program that facilitates compliance with minimum-age cannabis 19laws. For the fourth or subsequent offense in a 24-month 20period, the retailer shall be fined $800 if it does not have a 21training program that facilitates compliance with minimum-age 22cannabis laws. For the purposes of this subsection, the 2324-month period shall begin with the person's first violation 24of the Act. The penalties in this subsection are in addition to 25any other penalties prescribed under this Act.26    (f) A training program under this Section must facilitate   HB2748- 26 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1compliance with minimum-age cannabis laws and include at least 2the following elements: (i) it must explain that only 3individuals displaying valid identification demonstrating that 4they are 21 years of age or older shall be eligible to purchase 5cannabis, cannabis-infused products, CBD, or hemp; and (ii) it 6must explain where a clerk can check identification for a date 7of birth. The training may be conducted electronically. Each 8retailer that has a training program shall require each 9employee who completes the training program to sign a form 10attesting that the employee has received and completed 11cannabis training. The form shall be kept in the employee's 12file and may be used to provide proof of training. 13    (g) (e) No agent or employee of the licensee shall be 14disciplined or discharged for selling or furnishing cannabis 15or cannabis products to a person under 21 years of age if the 16agent or employee demanded and was shown, before furnishing 17cannabis or cannabis products to a person under 21 years of 18age, adequate written evidence of age and identity of the 19person. This subsection (e) does not apply if the agent or 20employee accepted the written evidence knowing it to be false 21or fraudulent. Adequate written evidence of age and identity 22of the person is a document issued by a federal, State, county, 23or municipal government, or subdivision or agency thereof, 24including, but not limited to, a motor vehicle operator's 25license, a registration certificate issued under the Military 26Selective Service Act, or an identification card issued to a   HB2748- 27 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1member of the Armed Forces. Proof that the licensee or his or 2her employee or agent was shown and reasonably relied upon 3such written evidence in any transaction forbidden by this 4Section is an affirmative defense in any criminal prosecution 5therefor or to any proceedings for the suspension or 6revocation of any license based thereon.7(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19.) 8    (410 ILCS 705/15-80)9    Sec. 15-80. Storage requirements. 10    (a) Authorized on-premises storage. A dispensing 11organization must store inventory on its premises. All 12inventory stored on the premises, including cannabis, 13cannabis-infused products, CBD, and hemp, must be secured in a 14restricted access area and tracked consistently with the 15inventory tracking rules.16    (b) A dispensary shall be of suitable size and 17construction to facilitate cleaning, maintenance, and proper 18operations.19    (c) A dispensary shall maintain adequate lighting, 20ventilation, temperature, humidity control, and equipment.21    (d) Containers storing cannabis, cannabis-infused 22products, CBD, or hemp that have been tampered with, damaged, 23or opened shall be labeled with the date opened and 24quarantined from other cannabis products in the vault until 25they are disposed.  HB2748- 28 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1    (e) Inventory Cannabis that was tampered with, expired, or 2damaged shall not be stored at the premises for more than 7 3calendar days.4    (f) Samples of cannabis, cannabis-infused products, CBD, 5and hemp Cannabis samples shall be stored in a sealed 6container. Samples shall be maintained in the restricted 7access area.8    (g) The dispensary storage areas shall be maintained in 9accordance with the security requirements in this Act and 10rules.11    (h) Cannabis, cannabis-infused products, CBD, and hemp 12must be stored at appropriate temperatures and under 13appropriate conditions to help ensure that the its packaging, 14strength, quality, and purity are not adversely affected.15(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19.) 16    (410 ILCS 705/15-85)17    Sec. 15-85. Dispensing cannabis. 18    (a) Before a dispensing organization agent dispenses 19cannabis, cannabis-infused products, CBD, or hemp to a 20purchaser, the agent shall:21        (1) Verify the age of the purchaser by checking a 22    government-issued identification card by use of an 23    electronic reader or electronic scanning device to scan a 24    purchaser's government-issued identification, if 25    applicable, to determine the purchaser's age and the   HB2748- 29 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1    validity of the identification;2        (2) Verify the validity of the government-issued 3    identification card by use of an electronic reader or 4    electronic scanning device to scan a purchaser's 5    government-issued identification, if applicable, to 6    determine the purchaser's age and the validity of the 7    identification;8        (3) Offer any appropriate purchaser education or 9    support materials;10        (4) Enter the following information into the State's 11    cannabis electronic verification system:12            (i) The dispensing organization agent's 13        identification number, or if the agent's card 14        application is pending the Department's approval, a 15        temporary and unique identifier until the agent's card 16        application is approved or denied by the Department;17            (ii) The dispensing organization's identification 18        number;19            (iii) The amount and , type (including strain, if 20        applicable) of cannabis, or cannabis-infused product, 21        CBD, or hemp dispensed;22            (iv) The date and time the cannabis, 23        cannabis-infused product, CBD, or hemp was dispensed.24    (b) A dispensing organization shall refuse to sell 25cannabis, or cannabis-infused products, CBD, or hemp to any 26person unless the person produces a valid identification   HB2748- 30 -LRB104 09828 BDA 19896 b1showing that the person is 21 years of age or older. A medical 2cannabis dispensing organization may sell cannabis, or 3cannabis-infused products, CBD, or hemp to a person who is 4under 21 years of age if the sale complies with the provisions 5of the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act and 6rules. 7    (c) For the purposes of this Section, valid identification 8must:9        (1) Be valid and unexpired;10        (2) Contain a photograph and the date of birth of the 11    person.12(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 101-593, eff. 12-4-19; 13102-98, eff. 7-15-21.)